Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Registration.

Sec. 45.08.401.
Duty of issuer to register transfer.

If a certificated security in registered form is presented to the issuer with a request to register transfer or an instruction is presented to the issuer with a request to register transfer of an uncertificated security, the issuer shall register the transfer as requested if

under the terms of the security the person seeking registration of transfer is eligible to have the security registered in the person’s name;

the endorsement or instruction is made by the appropriate person or by an agent who has actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person;

reasonable assurance is given under AS

45.08.402

that the endorsement or instruction is genuine and authorized;

applicable law relating to the collection of taxes has been complied with;

the transfer does not violate a restriction on transfer imposed by the issuer under AS

45.08.204

;

a demand that the issuer not register transfer has not become effective under AS

45.08.403

, or the issuer has complied with AS

45.08.403

(b) but legal process or indemnity bond is not obtained under AS

45.08.403(d)

; and

the transfer is in fact rightful or is to a protected purchaser.

If an issuer is under a duty to register a transfer of a security, the issuer is liable to a person presenting a certificated security or an instruction for registration or to the person’s principal for loss resulting from an unreasonable delay in registration or failure or refusal to register the transfer.

History.

(§ 8.401 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 44 ch 49 SLA 1990; am §§ 36, 37 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.402.
Assurance that endorsements and instructions are effective.

An issuer may require the following assurance that each necessary endorsement or each instruction is genuine and authorized:

in all cases, a guarantee of the signature of the person making an endorsement or originating an instruction including, in the case of an instruction, reasonable assurance of identity;

if the endorsement is made or the instruction is originated by an agent, appropriate assurance of actual authority to sign;

if the endorsement is made or the instruction is originated by a fiduciary under AS

45.08.107(e)(4)

or (5), appropriate evidence of appointment or incumbency;

if there is more than one fiduciary, reasonable assurance that all who are required to sign have done so; and

if the endorsement is made or the instruction is originated by a person not covered by another provision of this subsection, assurance appropriate to the case corresponding as nearly as may be to the provisions of this subsection.

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

In this section,

“appropriate evidence of appointment or incumbency” means

in the case of a fiduciary appointed or qualified by a court, a certificate issued by or under the direction or supervision of the court or an officer of the court and dated within 60 days before the date of presentation for transfer; or

in any other case, a copy of a document showing the appointment or a certificate issued by or on behalf of a person reasonably believed by the issuer to be responsible or, in the absence of that document or certificate, other evidence the issuer reasonably considers to be appropriate;

“guarantee of the signature” means a guarantee signed by or on behalf of a person reasonably believed by the issuer to be responsible; an issuer may adopt standards with respect to responsibility if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

An issuer may elect to require reasonable assurance beyond that specified in this section.

History.

(§ 8.402 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 45 ch 49 SLA 1990; am §§ 38 — 40, 68 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.403.
Demand that issuer not register transfer.

A person who is an appropriate person to make an endorsement or originate an instruction may demand that the issuer not register transfer of a security by communicating to the issuer a notification that identifies the registered owner and the issue of which the security is a part and provides an address for communications directed to the person making the demand. The demand is effective only if it is received by the issuer at a time and in a manner affording the issuer reasonable opportunity to act on it.

If a certificated security in registered form is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer or an instruction is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer of an uncertificated security after a demand that the issuer not register transfer has become effective, the issuer shall promptly communicate to the person who initiated the demand at the address provided in the demand and to the person who presented the security for registration of transfer or initiated the instruction requesting registration of transfer a notification stating that

the certificated security has been presented for registration of transfer or the instruction for registration of transfer of the uncertificated security has been received;

a demand that the issuer not register transfer had previously been received; and

the issuer will withhold registration of transfer for a period of time stated in the notification in order to provide the person who initiated the demand an opportunity to obtain legal process or an indemnity bond.

The period described in (b)(3) of this section may not exceed 30 days after the date of communication of the notification. A shorter period may be specified by the issuer if it is not manifestly unreasonable.

An issuer is not liable to a person who initiated a demand that the issuer not register transfer for loss the person suffers as a result of registration of a transfer under an effective endorsement or instruction if the person who initiated the demand does not, within the time stated in the issuer’s communication, either

obtain an appropriate restraining order, injunction, or other process from a court of competent jurisdiction enjoining the issuer from registering the transfer; or

file with the issuer an indemnity bond, sufficient in the issuer’s judgment to protect the issuer and any transfer agent, registrar, or other agent of the issuer involved from a loss the issuer, transfer agent, registrar, or other agent of the issuer may suffer by refusing to register the transfer.

This section does not relieve an issuer from liability for registering transfer under an endorsement or instruction that was not effective.

History.

(§ 8.403 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 46, 47 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 41 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.404.
Wrongful registration.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.08.406

, an issuer is liable for wrongful registration of transfer if the issuer has registered a transfer of a security to a person not entitled to the security and the transfer was registered

under an ineffective endorsement or instruction;

after a demand that the issuer not register transfer became effective under AS

45.08.403(a)

and the issuer did not comply with AS

45.08.403(b)

;

after the issuer had been served with an injunction, restraining order, or other legal process enjoining it from registering the transfer, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, and the issuer had a reasonable opportunity to act on the injunction, restraining order, or other legal process; or

by an issuer acting in collusion with the wrongdoer.

An issuer that is liable for wrongful registration of transfer under (a) of this section on demand shall provide the person entitled to the security with a like certificated or uncertificated security, and payments or distributions that the person did not receive as a result of the wrongful registration. If an overissue would result, the issuer’s liability to provide the person with a like security is governed by AS

45.08.210

.

Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this section or in a law relating to the collection of taxes, an issuer is not liable to an owner or other person suffering loss as a result of the registration of a transfer of a security if registration was made under an effective endorsement or instruction.

History.

(§ 8.404 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 48, 49 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 42 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.405.
Lost, destroyed, and stolen certificated securities.

[Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]

If the owner of a certificated security, whether in registered or bearer form, claims that the certificate has been lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken, the issuer shall issue a new certificate if the owner

so requests before the issuer has notice that the certificate has been acquired by a protected purchaser;

files with the issuer a sufficient indemnity bond; and

satisfies other reasonable requirements imposed by the issuer.

If, after the issue of a new security certificate, a protected purchaser of the original certificate presents the original certificate for registration of transfer, the issuer shall register the transfer unless an overissue would result. In that case, the issuer’s liability is governed by AS

45.08.210

. In addition to rights on the indemnity bond, an issuer may recover the new certificate from a person to whom it was issued or a person taking under that person, except a protected purchaser.

History.

(§ 8.405 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 50 ch 49 SLA 1990; am §§ 43, 44, 68 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.406.
Obligation to notify issuer of lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken security certificate.

If a security certificate has been lost, apparently destroyed, or wrongfully taken, the owner fails to notify the issuer of the loss, destruction, or taking within a reasonable time after the owner has notice of the loss, destruction, or taking, and the issuer registers a transfer of the security before receiving notification, the owner may not assert against the issuer a claim for registering the transfer under AS

45.08.404

or a claim to a new security certificate under AS

45.08.405

.

History.

(§ 8.406 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 51 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 45 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.407.
Authenticating trustee, transfer agent, and registrar.

A person acting as authenticating trustee, transfer agent, registrar, or other agent for an issuer in the registration of a transfer of its securities, in the issue of new security certificates or uncertificated securities, or in the cancellation of surrendered security certificates has the same obligation to the holder or owner of a certificated or uncertificated security with regard to the particular functions performed as the issuer has in regard to those functions.

History.

(§ 52 ch 49 SLA 1990; am § 46 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.408.
Statements of uncertificated securities. [Repealed, § 68 ch 17 SLA 1996.]